Iowa, session 2025-2026, SJR2010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 34 SJR 2010 (3) 91 da/js/mb S.J.R. 2010 Section 1. STATE HORSE DESIGNATED. The American cream draft 1 horse is designated and shall be officially known as the state 2 horse of Iowa. 3 Sec. 2. APPROPRIATE REPRESENTATIONS. The state historical 4 society shall cooperate with the American cream draft 5 horse association to obtain appropriate pictures and other 6 representations of the American cream draft horse and shall 7 display the pictures and representations in an appropriate 8 place in the state historical museum. 9 Sec. 3. OFFICIAL REGISTER. The editor of the Iowa official 10 register shall cooperate with the American cream draft horse 11 association to include an appropriate picture and commentary of 12 the American cream draft horse in the Iowa official register 13 along with the pictures of the state rock, state flower, state 14 bird, and state tree. 15 -1- SJR 2010 (3) 91 da/js/mb 1/ 1